Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 555, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Commission for the Blind,  is increased by $963,482 for expending supple-
mental award from the United States Department of Education and  carryforward funds from
the Vocational Rehabilitation Grant.
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds from
the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected  or received by the State Forestry
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration ..................... $ 35,626,463
(2) Fire protection ................................... $ 73,073,033
(3) State forests .......................................$ 92,937,670
(4) Private forests ................................... $ 10,777,171
(5) Capital improvement ........................ $ 4,608,658
[(6) Debt service .........................................$ 692,528]
(6) Debt service program
(a) Debt service .............................. $ 727,883
(b) Bond issuance and
related expenses........................ $ 1,035,000
(7) Equipment pool .................................. $ 16,653,089
(8) Facilities maintenance
and management ................................ $ 5,435,565
SECTION 3. Section 123, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 592, Oregon Laws  2017, for
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 1
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $31,545,752 for the payment of emergency
firefighting costs associated with the 2018 forest fire season.
SECTION 5.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (1), chapter 606, Oregon  Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for administrative services, is decreased by
$319,930.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Water Resources Department by section 1 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws  2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for field services, is decreased by $266,000.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Water Resources Department by section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws  2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for water rights and adjudications, is decreased by $200,000.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter 606, Oregon Laws  2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for technical services, is increased by $19,611.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws  2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the director’s office, is increased by $766,319.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the expenditure limi-
tation established by section 120, chapter  702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of State Lands, from the  Portland Harbor Cleanup
Fund established by section 11, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is decreased by $6,235,000.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amount of  $12,000,000 is transferred from the Common School Fund
to the  Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund established by section 11, chapter 748, Oregon Laws
2017, to be used for the purposes specified in that section, subject to subsection (2)  of this
section.
(2) The transferred amount must be separately accounted for and may be used  only for
purposes permissible under Article VIII, section 5, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 7a. (1) The amount of $12,000,000 is transferred from the State  Highway Fund
to the  Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund established by section 11, chapter 748, Oregon Laws
2017, to be used for the purposes specified in that section, subject to subsection (2)  of this
section.
(2) The transferred amount must be separately accounted for and may be used  only for
purposes permissible under Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys,  or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund
programs, is increased by $4,922,972 for expenses associated with the cleanup  efforts at the
Goble, Oregon, site on the Columbia River.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section  1, chapter 536, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $62,368 for unanticipated personal  services
costs.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 373, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 2
collected or received by the Oregon Board  of Naturopathic Medicine, is increased by $100,000
for the payment of costs associated with a new licensing database.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 373, Oregon Laws 2017,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by  the Board of Medical Imaging, is increased by $60,000 for the pay-
ment of costs associated with a new licensing database.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6,  chapter 373, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board, is  increased
by $100,000 for the payment of costs associated with a new licensing database.
SECTION 13.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the expenditure
limitation established  by section 2 (1), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 572, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Chief Operating Office, is increased by $29,866.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  expenditure limitation es-
tablished by section 2 (7), chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds received from charges, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 572, Oregon  Laws 2017,
collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for  Enterprise
Goods and Services, is increased by $253,258.
NOTE:
 Section 14 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 544, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 544, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife, for the Fish Division, is decreased by
$1,700,000.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 544, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 544, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the Wildlife Division,  is increased by
$1,700,000.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in sections  9 and 10, chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for  operations, is increased by $125,000
for expending the funds of a grant from the Lumina Foundation.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 6 (1), chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 3
and funds described in sections  9 and 10, chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for operations, is increased  by $40,700 for
the costs of administering the Volunteers program grant.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from federal funds,  other than those described in sections 4 and 10,
chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2017, received by the Department of  Education, for early learning
programs, is increased by $1,010,625  for a pilot project to provide child care for infants and
toddlers.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 582, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Public Defense Services Commission, for professional
services, is decreased by $90,000.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 582, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Defense  Services Commission, for the Contract and
Business Services Division, is increased by $90,000.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 582, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for professional services, is increased by
$4,493,458.
SECTION 23.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (6), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the Division of Child Support, is decreased by $1,343,260
for the child support enforcement automated system project.
SECTION 24.
There is appropriated to the  Department of Justice, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,343,260, for system development
costs for the child support enforcement automated system.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (5), chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the  defense of criminal convictions, is increased by
$700,000.
SECTION 26.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1, chapter 535, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for the payment of expenses of district attorneys, is increased
by $350,000.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (1), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for operations and health services, is  increased by
$30,381,426.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (2), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for central administration and administrative  services,
is increased by $11,133,885.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (3), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 4
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for offender management  and rehabilitation, is decreased
by $2,000,000.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (4), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for community corrections, is increased by $1,504,245.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (6), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for capital improvements, is decreased by $1,276,717.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Corrections, for operations and  health
services, is increased by $4,902,939.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of Corrections, for central administration and
administrative services, is decreased by $6,384,560.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received  by the Department of Corrections, for offender management and
rehabilitation, is increased by $591,035.
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Corrections, for community corrections,
is increased by $890,587.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017, for
the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for administrative services, agency support, criminal
justice information services and the office  of the State Fire Marshal, is increased by
$6,665,000.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Department of State Police, for patrol services, criminal
investigations and gaming enforcement, is increased by $4,100,000.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the  Department of State Police, for fish and wildlife enforce-
ment, is increased by $2,900,000.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 5
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of State Police, for administrative services,
agency support, criminal justice information services and the office of the State Fire Mar-
shal, is decreased by $7,000,000.
SECTION 40.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (1), chapter 566, Oregon  Laws 2017, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for administration, is increased by $50,100.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 566, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
566, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received  by the Oregon Military Department, for com-
munity support, is increased by $3,850,000.
SECTION 42.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 510, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the State Library, is increased by $140,000.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 702, Oregon Laws 2017, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as modified by legislative or Emergency Board action, is decreased by
$57,255,961.
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized  appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2019, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 572 1(5) -$654,700
ODAS debt service
Other Funds Ch. 572 2(13) -25,900
Department of Revenue:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 601 1(6) -48,686
Debt service and
related costs
Other Funds Ch. 601 2(8) -3,985
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 6
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 574 5 -$512,835
Oregon Business
Development Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 580 1(3) -444,873
(3) EDUCATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Education:
Debt service - XI-Q bonds
General Fund Ch. 702 52 -$50,387
Debt service - XI-P bonds
General Fund Ch. 590 8 -20,392
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold pursuant to Article
XI-G of the Oregon Constitution
for the benefit of Oregon
community colleges
General Fund Ch. 595 1(16)(a) -8,200
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold pursuant to Article
XI-G of the Oregon Constitution
for the benefit of Oregon
public universities
General Fund Ch. 595 1(16)(b) -36,000
Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article
XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution
for the benefit of Oregon
public universities
General Fund Ch. 595
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 7
1(16)(d) -3,561,231
Debt service on Article
XI-G and XI-Q bonds issued
for the benefit of Oregon
public universities
Other Funds Ch. 595 6(3) 3,561,294
2018
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Education:
Debt service - XI-P bonds
Other Funds Ch. 99 76 $20,392
(4) HUMAN SERVICES.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Human
Services:
Debt service and related
costs
General Fund Ch. 702 104 -$3,354,521
Oregon Health Authority:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 545 1(4) 911,612
(5) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 577 1(2) -$72,813
(6) NATURAL RESOURCES.
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 8
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 591 1(5) -$56,767
State Forestry Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 592 1(4) -32,119
(7) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 573 1(5) $50,047
Department of Justice:
Debt service and related
costs
General Fund Ch. 576 1(7) -198,163
Oregon Military Department:
Capital debt service and
related costs
General Fund Ch. 566 1(5) -442,881
Oregon Youth Authority:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 588 1(5) -890,785
2018
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 99 170 $55,192
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized appropriations
for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, for the following agencies are changed by the amounts
specified:
2017
Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 9
Chapter/
Agency Title Section Total
Office of the Legislative
Counsel Ch. 577 10 -$13,400
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee Ch. 577 14  -13,700
Legislative Revenue Officer Ch. 577 15 -3,600
Legislative Fiscal Officer Ch. 577 13(1) -7,100
Legislative Assembly Ch. 577 7(1) -977,100
Legislative Assembly Ch. 577 7(2) 1,895,600
Legislative Assembly Ch. 577 6 -988,600
Legislative Administration
Committee Ch. 577 1(1) 108,900
Commission on Indian
Services Ch. 577 16 -1,000
SECTION 46.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 14, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5046 (HB 5046-A) Page 10